Icelandic.aff
SET UTF-8

#Letter frequency based on all Icelandic text from www.snerpa.is/net
TRY arniesutðglmkofhvþádíójbúyöæépÞHSEGýBAVKNOFMJDLRÍÁTÓxIÉUzPÖcÚÆYÐCqXwÝQWZ
WORDCHARS "-./=
KEY qwertyuiopð|asdfghjklæ|zxcvbnm,.þ

#Splitted suggestions are most likely compound words
NOSPLITSUGS

# rules from http://www2.hu-berlin.de/bragi/b5/b5framburdarreglur.htm
REP 57
REP i y
REP y i
REP í ý
REP ý í
REP áng ang
REP eing eng
REP eyng eng
REP íng ing
REP ýng ing
REP úng ung
REP íng yng
REP ýng yng
REP aung öng
REP ánk ank
REP eink enk
REP eynk enk
REP ínk ink
REP ýnk ink
REP únk unk
REP ínk ynk
REP ýnk ynk
REP aunk önk
REP ægi agi
REP eigi egi
REP eygi egi
REP ígi igi
REP ýgi igi
REP oji ogi
REP uji ugi
REP yji ygi
REP augi ögi
REP v f
REP kv hv
REP dl ll
REP dn nn
REP md fnd
REP mt fnd
REP bl fl
REP bn fn
REP rdl rl
REP rdn rn
REP sdl sl
REP sdn sn
REP gt t
REP kt t
REP ói ófi
REP óa ófa
REP úa úfa
REP ngl nl
REP lgd gld
REP nd rnd
REP st rst
REP ð þ
REP gs x
REP ks x
REP x gs
REP x ks

FLAG num

#kk et agr
SFX 1	N 21
SFX 1	ur	0
SFX 1	n	0	nn
SFX 1	l	0	ll
SFX 1	ur	i
SFX 1	n	i	einn
SFX 1	n	i	ónn
SFX 1	inn	ni	[^e]inn
SFX 1	unn	ni
SFX 1	ill	li
SFX 1	all	li
SFX 1	ull	li
SFX 1	0	i	u[^r]
SFX 1	0	i	n[^n]
SFX 1	0	i	[^unl][^l]
SFX 1	0	i	[^l]l
SFX 1	ur	s
SFX 1	n	s	nn
SFX 1	l	s	ll
SFX 1	0	s	u[^r]
SFX 1	0	s	n[^n]
SFX 1	0	s	[^un].

#kk et gr
SFX 2	N 22
SFX 2	0	inn
SFX 2	ur	inn
SFX 2	n	inn	nn
SFX 2	l	inn	ll
SFX 2	ur	inum
SFX 2	n	inum	einn
SFX 2	n	inum	ónn
SFX 2	inn	ninum	[^e]inn
SFX 2	unn	ninum
SFX 2	ill	linum
SFX 2	all	linum
SFX 2	ull	linum
SFX 2	0	inum	u[^r]
SFX 2	0	inum	n[^n]
SFX 2	0	inum	[^unl][^l]
SFX 2	0	inum	[^l]l
SFX 2	ur	sins
SFX 2	n	sins	nn
SFX 2	l	sins	ll
SFX 2	0	sins	u[^r]
SFX 2	0	sins	n[^n]
SFX 2	0	sins	[^un].

#kk et agr -s
SFX 3	N 7
SFX 3	ur	0	ur
SFX 3	n	0	nn
SFX 3	ur	i	ur
SFX 3	n	i	nn
SFX 3	0	i	u[^r]
SFX 3	0	i	n[^n]
SFX 3	0	i	[^un].

#kk et gr -s
SFX 4	N 13
SFX 4	0	inn
SFX 4	ur	inn	ur
SFX 4	n	inn	nn
SFX 4	ur	inum	ur
SFX 4	n	inum	nn
SFX 4	0	inum	u[^r]
SFX 4	0	inum	n[^n]
SFX 4	0	inum	[^un].
SFX 4	ur	ins	ur
SFX 4	n	ins	nn
SFX 4	0	ins	u[^r]
SFX 4	0	ins	n[^n]
SFX 4	0	ins	[^un].

#kk sb/vb ft agr
SFX 5	N 4
SFX 5	r	0
SFX 5	ar	um
SFX 5	ir	um
SFX 5	ir	a

#kk sb/vb ft gr
SFX 6	N 6
SFX 6	0	nir
SFX 6	r	na
SFX 6	ar	unum
SFX 6	ir	unum
SFX 6	ar	anna
SFX 6	ir	anna

#kk sb/vb ft agr
SFX 7	N 1
SFX 7	r	0

#kk sb/vb ft gr
SFX 8	N 3
SFX 8	0	nir
SFX 8	r	na
SFX 8	r	nna

#kk sb et agr a
SFX 11	N 7
SFX 11	ur	0	[^a]ur
SFX 11	l	0	ll
SFX 11	ur	s	[^a]ur
SFX 11	0	s	aur
SFX 11	0	s	[^rl]
SFX 11	0	s	[^ul].
SFX 11	l	s	ll

#kk et gr b
SFX 12	N 13
SFX 12	0	inn
SFX 12	ur	inn	[^a]ur
SFX 12	l	inn	ll
SFX 12	ur	num	[^a]ur
SFX 12	0	num	aur
SFX 12	l	num	ll
SFX 12	0	num	[^rl]
SFX 12	0	num	[^ul].
SFX 12	ur	sins	[^a]ur
SFX 12	0	sins	aur
SFX 12	0	sins	[^rl]
SFX 12	0	sins	[^ul].
SFX 12	l	sins	ll

#kk vb et agr
SFX 22	N 1
SFX 22	i	a

#kk vb et gr
SFX 23	N 4
SFX 23	0	nn
SFX 23	i	ann
SFX 23	i	anum
SFX 23	i	ans

#son/dóttir
SFX 26	N 11
SFX 26	0	son
SFX 26	0	syni
SFX 26	0	sonar
SFX 26	0	synir
SFX 26	0	sonum
SFX 26	0	sona
SFX 26	0	dóttir
SFX 26	0	dóttur
SFX 26	0	dætur
SFX 26	0	dætrum
SFX 26	0	dætra

#kvk et agr i
SFX 13	N 6
SFX 13	ur      i       ur
SFX 13	0       i       u[^r]
SFX 13	0       i       [^u].
SFX 13	ur      ar       ur
SFX 13	0       ar       u[^r]
SFX 13	0       ar       [^u].

#kvk vb et agr
SFX 14	N 1
SFX 14	a	u

#kvk vb et gr
SFX 15	N 4
SFX 15	0	n
SFX 15	a	una
SFX 15	a	unni
SFX 15	a	unnar

#kvk vb ft agr
SFX 16	N 2
SFX 16	r	m
SFX 16	ur	a

#kvk vb ft gr
SFX 17	N 3
SFX 17	0	nar
SFX 17	r	num
SFX 17	ur	anna

#kvk sb et agr
SFX 18	N 1
SFX 18	0	ar

#kvk sb et gr
SFX 19	N 4
SFX 19  0       in
SFX 19  0       ina
SFX 19  0       inni
SFX 19	0	arinnar

#kvk sb ft agr
SFX 20	N 6
SFX 20  ir	um	[^a]nir
SFX 20  ir	um	[^n]ir
SFX 20  anir	unum
SFX 20	ar	um
SFX 20  ir	a
SFX 20	ar	a

#kvk sb ft gr
SFX 21	N 7
SFX 21  0	nar
SFX 21  ir	unum	[^a]nir
SFX 21  ir	unum	[^n]ir
SFX 21	anir	ununum
SFX 21	ar	unum
SFX 21  ir	anna
SFX 21	ar	anna

#kvk vb ft agr
SFX 24	N 2
SFX 24	r       m
SFX 24	ur      na

#kvk vb ft gr
SFX 25	N 3
SFX 25	0       nar
SFX 25	r       num
SFX 25	ur      nanna

#kvk sb et agr u
SFX 31	N 2
SFX 31	0	ar
SFX 31	0	u

#kvk sb et gr u
SFX 32	N 4
SFX 32	0	in
SFX 32	0	una
SFX 32	0	unni
SFX 32	0	arinnar

#lo frumstig 1
SFX 400	N 13
SFX 400	0	an
SFX 400	0	um
SFX 400	0	s
SFX 400	0	a
SFX 400	0	ri
SFX 400	0	rar
SFX 400	0	t
SFX 400	0	u
SFX 400	0	ir
SFX 400	0	ra
SFX 400	0	ar
SFX 400	0	i
SFX 400	0	u

#lo miðstig 1
SFX 401	N 2
SFX 401	0	ari
SFX 401	0	ara

#lo frumstig 3
SFX 402	N 16
SFX 402	0	an
SFX 402	0	um
SFX 402	0	s
SFX 402	0	a
SFX 402	0	ni	n
SFX 402	0	li	l
SFX 402	0	nar	n
SFX 402	0	lar	l
SFX 402	0	t
SFX 402	0	u
SFX 402	0	ir
SFX 402	0	na	n
SFX 402	0	la	l
SFX 402	0	ar
SFX 402	0	i
SFX 402	0	u

#lo miðstig 3
SFX 403	N 2
SFX 403	0	i
SFX 403	0	a

#lo efsta stig
SFX 404	N 14
SFX 404	0	astur
SFX 404	0	astan
SFX 404	0	ustum
SFX 404	0	asts
SFX 404	0	ust
SFX 404	0	asta
SFX 404	0	astri
SFX 404	0	astrar
SFX 404	0	ast
SFX 404	0	ustu
SFX 404	0	astir
SFX 404	0	astra
SFX 404	0	astar
SFX 404	0	asti

#hk et agr
SFX 70	N 2
SFX 70	0	i	[^i]
SFX 70	0	s	.

#hk et gr
SFX 71	N 5
SFX 71	0	ið	[^i]
SFX 71	0	ð	i
SFX 71	0	inu	[^i]
SFX 71	0	nu	i
SFX 71	0	sins	.

#hk ft agr
SFX 72	N 4
SFX 72	0	um	[^i]
SFX 72	i	um	i
SFX 72	0	a	[^i]
SFX 72	i	a	i

#hk ft gr
SFX 73	N 6
SFX 73	0	in	[^i]
SFX 73	0	n	i
SFX 73	0	unum	[^i]
SFX 73	i	unum	i
SFX 73	0	anna	[^i]
SFX 73	i	anna	i

#hk ft agr
SFX 74	N 2
SFX 74	0	jum
SFX 74	0	ja

#hk ft gr
SFX 75	N 3
SFX 75	0	in
SFX 75	0	junum
SFX 75	0	janna

#hk ft agr þf þgf
SFX 76	N 1
SFX 76	0	um

#hk ft gr þf þgf
SFX 77	N 2
SFX 77	0	in
SFX 77	0	unum

#Fallbeyging hk sb 01
SFX 405 N 1
SFX 405	0	0/70,71,72,73		.
#Fallbeyging hk sb 01 et
SFX 406 N 1
SFX 406	0	0/70,71		.
#Fallbeyging hk sb 01 ft
SFX 407 N 1
SFX 407	0	0/72,73		.
#Fallbeyging hk sb 01 j
SFX 408 N 1
SFX 408	0	0/70,71,74,75		.
#Fallbeyging hk sb 01 ö
SFX 409 N 3
SFX 409	0	0/70,71
SFX 409	0	a
SFX 409	0	anna

#Fallbeyging hk sb 03
SFX 410 N 1
SFX 410	0	0/70,71,72,73	.

#Fallbeyging hk sb 03 et
SFX 411 N 1
SFX 411	0	0/70,71		.

#Fallbeyging hk sb örnefni 02
SFX 412 N 1
SFX 412	0	s

#Fallbeyging karlmannsnafn 01
SFX 413 N 6
SFX 413	0	0/1	.
SFX 413   ur      s/26	ur
SFX 413   n       s/26	nn
SFX 413   0       s/26	u[^r]
SFX 413   0       s/26	n[^n]
SFX 413   0       s/26	[^un].

#Fallbeyging karlmannsnafn 01a
SFX 414 N 5
SFX 414	0	s/26	[^u]r
SFX 414	0	s/26	[^u][^r]
SFX 414	0	s/26	u[^r]
SFX 414	ur	s/26	ur
SFX 414	ur	0	ur

#Fallbeyging karlmannsnafn 01 n
SFX 415 N 3
SFX 415	0	0/1
SFX 415   n       s/26	nn
SFX 415   l       s/26	ll

#Fallbeyging karlmannsnafn 04
SFX 416 N 2
SFX 416	r	0
SFX 416	r	s/26

#Fallbeyging kk sb 01
SFX 417 N 6
SFX 417	0	0/1,2
SFX 417	ur	ar/5,6	ur
SFX 417	n	ar/5,6	nn
SFX 417   0	ar/5,6	u[^r] 
SFX 417   0	ar/5,6	n[^n] 
SFX 417   0	ar/5,6	[^un].

#Fallbeyging kk sb 01a
SFX 418 N 7
SFX 418	0	0/11,12
SFX 418	ur	ar/5,6	[^a]ur
SFX 418	l	ar/5,6	l
SFX 418   0	ar/5,6	u[^r] 
SFX 418   0	ar/5,6	l[^l] 
SFX 418   0	ar/5,6	[^ul].
SFX 418	0	ar/5,6	aur

#Fallbeyging kk sb 01b
SFX 419 N 6
SFX 419	0	0/1,12
SFX 419	ur	ar/5,6	ur
SFX 419	n	ar/5,6	nn
SFX 419   0	ar/5,6	u[^r] 
SFX 419   0	ar/5,6	n[^n] 
SFX 419   0	ar/5,6	[^un].

#Fallbeyging kk sb 01 et
SFX 420 N 1
SFX 420	0	0/1,2	.

#Fallbeyging kk sb 01 ft
SFX 421 N 1
SFX 421	0	0/5,6	.

#Fallbeyging kk sb 01 n
SFX 422 N 8
SFX 422	0	0/1,2
SFX 422	ur	ar/5,6
SFX 422	n	ar/5,6	nn
SFX 422	ill	lar/5,6
SFX 422	all	lar/5,6
SFX 422	ull	lar/5,6
SFX 422	unn	nar/5,6
SFX 422	inn	nar/5,6

#Fallbeyging kk sb 01 n et
SFX 423 N 1
SFX 423	0	0/1,2

#Fallbeyging kk sb 01 ö
SFX 424 N 6
SFX 424	0	0/1,2
SFX 424	ur	ar/7,8	ur
SFX 424	n	ar/7,8	nn
SFX 424   0	ar/7,8	u[^r] 
SFX 424   0	ar/7,8	n[^n] 
SFX 424   0	ar/7,8	[^un].

#Fallbeyging kk sb 01 -s
SFX 425 N 6
SFX 425	0	0/3,4		.
SFX 425	ur	ar/5,6	ur
SFX 425	n	ar/5,6	nn
SFX 425   0	ar/5,6	u[^r] 
SFX 425   0	ar/5,6	n[^n] 
SFX 425   0	ar/5,6	[^un].

#Fallbeyging kk sb 02
SFX 426 N 4
SFX 426	0	0/1,2
SFX 426	ur	ir/5,6	ur
SFX 426   0	ir/5,6	u[^r]
SFX 426   0	ir/5,6	[^u].
