Icelandic.dic
Adam/414
Adolf/414
Adólf/414
Angantýr/414
Arnþór/413
Benín/412
Benóný/414
Birgir/416
Birnir/416
Bjarnar/413
Brimir/416
Christian/414
Djíbútí/412
Drengur/414
Eilífur/413
Einir/416
Engill/415
Erik/414
Eyjafjallajökull/423
Finngeir/413
Fjölnir/416
Fífill/415
Geir/414
Gellir/416
Gunnlaugur/413
Guð/426
Gýmir/416
Heiðbert/413
Hildir/414
Hilmir/416
Hlöðvarður/413
Héðinn/415
Ingiþór/413
Jemen/412
Jósef/414
Katar/412
Kristþór/413
Kírbatí/412
Leiknir/416
Litháen/412
Malí/412
Miklihvellur/420
Mónakó/412
Níger/412
Olgeir/413
Peter/414
Portúgal/412
Reynir/416
Rúrik/414
Sigþór/413
Styrmir/416
Svisslendingur/419
Síle/412
Sírnir/416
Tindur/413
Tsjad/412
Viggó/414
Víetnam/412
alheimur/420
alifuglakjöt/406
arfur/420
atlassedrus/425
atvinnuleysi/411
aðalbláber/408
aðall/423
aðflutningsbann/409
banamein/405
barkakýli/410
barmur/424
barnabarnabörn/76,77	st:barnabarnabarn
berklar/421
beyki/411
bismút/406
bitmý/408
blak/409
blettur/426
bláber/408
blátittlingur/419
blóðleysi/411
blóðrefill/422
blóðþrýstingur/417
brjóstbörn/76,77	st:brjóstbarn
bál/405
bæti/410
bíll/418
bókasafn/409
bý/408
dagatöl/76,77	st:dagatal
dallur/424
depill/422
draugagangur/420
draumheimur/417
draumórar/421
dubnín/406
dvergtittlingur/419
dvergur/418
dömubindi/410
dýragarður/424
eldfjall/409
eldhöf/76,77	st:eldhaf
eldur/417
evrópulerki/411
fagurfífill/422
feill/418
feðg/421
feðgin/407
feðraveldi/410
fiðrildablóm/405
fiðringur/420
fjall/409
fjármál/407
fjársjóður/426
flokkur/419
flækingur/417
flóðgarður/424
flögð/76,77	st:flagð
foreldrar/421
forgengill/422
forsetningarfall/409
fosfór/406
foss/425
fress/425
frumulíffæri/410
færibönd/76,77	st:færiband
fóður/405
föðurforeldrar/421
föðurlandssvik/407
gandur/424
geldingur/417
gestur/426
gler/408
glópur/418
grasagarður/424
grið/407
grundvallarréttur/426
grágrýti/411
grátur/420
gráþyrill/422
grófyrði/410
gróm/406
gufubað/409
guð/426
gæðingur/417
göbb/76,77	st:gabb
handarkoss/425
handkoss/425
heilahristingur/420
heimskaut/405
hettutittlingur/419
hindber/408
hlýr/418
hnykill/422
hrafn/424
hristingur/417
hryllingur/420
hrístittlingur/419
hvelatengsl/407
hvítkorn/405
hyldýpi/411
hádegi/410
háls/425
hárvatn/409
háð/406
húsgögn/76,77	st:húsgagn
hýsill/422
inngangur/424
jarmur/420
jarðarber/408
jól/407
kabarett/418
kafarabúningur/419
kaffi/411
kafteinn/417
kalsín/406
karl/424
kok/405
koss/425
kross/425
krókódíll/418
kvenkyn/408
kvistur/426
kál/406
kálfiðrildi/410
kímstöngull/422
kólibrífugl/417
kórallur/424
kúftittlingur/419
lag/409
landráð/407
laufblöð/76,77	st:laufblað
laun/407
leigubíll/418
leyfisleysi/411
ljóð/405
lofðungur/419
lyf/408
lífi/411
lúr/418
mal/406
meltingarkerfi/410
meðvitundarleysi/411
misling/421
miðill/422
morð/405
mágur/417
mæðgin/407
móðurforeldrar/421
mörsugur/420
mýr/406
nef/408
nefnifall/409
neyðarbíll/418
notandaspjöll/76,77	st:notandaspjall
nýstirni/410
orð/405
pels/425
plúton/406
páskaegg/408
póll/418
póstur/417
púls/425
rafmagnsleysi/411
refill/422
rembingskoss/425
rusl/406
rákahöfrungur/419
ræfill/422
ríkisborgararéttur/426
samfélag/409
samkyn/408
samvistarföll/76,77	st:samvistarfall
sandur/424
sannur/420
sedrus/425
segulljós/407
sig/405
sjampó/406
sjávarlíffræðingur/417
sjúklingur/419
skafrenningur/420
skammdegi/411
skemill/422
skilaboð/407
skjálftasvæði/410
skúr/418
skúraský/408
sléttbakur/424
snittubrauð/405
spurnarfornafn/409
spítall/423
staðgengill/422
stjörnuhröp/76,77	st:stjörnuhrap
storkuberg/406
strandtittlingur/419
strætó/418
stríðsguð/426
stýri/410
svik/407
sætabrauð/405
súrefnisskortur/420
tap/409
tarfur/424
tengdaforeldrar/421
tengsl/407
tilfelli/411
tindur/417
tækisföll/76,77	st:tækisfall
tíst/405
tónleik/421
töfr/421
ununtrín/406
vegur/420
veldi/410
verkfærisfall/409
vetrartittlingur/419
vængjasnigill/422
víg/405
vínber/408
vír/418
völd/76,77	st:vald
yfirráð/407
Ágúst/413
Ásvarður/413
Ægir/416
Óðinn/415
Úlfhéðinn/415
Úrúgvæ/412
Þyrnir/416
ábyrgðarleysi/411
ábætisréttur/426
árgangur/424
ávæningur/417
æviferill/423
úrferðarfall/409
úrferðarföll/76,77	st:úrferðarfall
úrslit/407
þinur/426
þjóðerni/410
þrumuský/408
þríhyrningur/419
